Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-817
Lien; removal of property; consent of holder of lien required.

When any lien provided for by sections 57-801 to 57-820 shall have attached to the property covered thereby, it shall be unlawful for any person to remove such property, or any part thereof, or cause the same to be removed from the premises where located at the time such lien attached or otherwise dispose of the same without the written consent of the holder of such lien.

Laws 1957, c. 241, § 17, p. 814.